Illinois, session 104th, HB1047.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Social 5Gaming Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board. 8    "Eligible location" means a location with a valid license 9to host a video gaming terminal or terminals under the Video 10Gaming Act. 11    "Social gaming board distributor" means a person who 12distributes social gaming boards. 13    "Social gaming board game" means a game using a square, 142-dimensional board, graphically drawn to present 100 separate 15spaces in a configuration in which 10 separate lines, each 16numbered consecutively in an order 0 through 9, are laid out on 17each side of the board and a winner is selected by matching the 18final score of a sporting event to the matching box selected by 19a player.20    "Social gaming board manufacturer" means a person who 21manufactures social gaming boards. 22    "Social gaming location" means an eligible location at 23which bets on a social gaming board game must be placed and   HB1047- 2 -LRB104 03172 LNS 13193 b1paid off within the social gaming location.2    "Sporting event" means an event operated by the National 3Football League, Major League Baseball, National Association 4for Stock Car Auto Racing, PGA Tour, LIV Golf, and any horse 5race track that is authorized to host races in the United 6States. "Sporting event" also includes a football game played 7within Division I of the National Collegiate Athletic 8Association. 9    Section 10. Licensure. 10    (a) No person may operate a social gaming board game or 11manufacture and distribute social gaming boards without a 12license issued by the Board.13    (b) The Board shall license social gaming board 14manufacturers, social gaming board distributors, and social 15gaming locations. Each licensee shall pay an annual license 16fee to the Board as follows:17        (1) a social gaming board manufacturer shall pay a 18    license fee of $5,000 to the Board;19        (2) a social gaming board distributor shall pay a 20    license fee of $1,000 to the Board; and21        (3) the operator of a social gaming location shall pay 22    a license fee of $50 to the Board.23    (c) The operator of a social gaming location shall not pay 24out more than $1,199 per social gaming board game.25    (d) A licensee may pursue relief from a disciplinary   HB1047- 3 -LRB104 03172 LNS 13193 b1action or penalty with the Board in accordance with the 2Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 3    Section 15. Report. The Board shall report to the Governor 4and the General Assembly, no later than December 31, 2025 and 5each year thereafter through 2029, on the implementation and 6administration of this Act. 7    Section 20. Rules. The Board shall adopt rules and 8emergency rules to implement and administer this Act, 9including, but not limited to, rules establishing disciplinary 10procedures and rules establishing penalties for violations of 11the Act and rules adopted under the Act. 12    Section 90. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 13amended by adding Section 5-45.61 as follows: 14    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.61 new)15    Sec. 5-45.61. Emergency rulemaking; Social Gaming Act. To 16provide for the expeditious and timely implementation of the 17Social Gaming Act, emergency rules implementing the Social 18Gaming Act may be adopted in accordance with Section 5-45 by 19the Illinois Gaming Board. The adoption of emergency rules 20authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to be 21necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.22    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date   HB1047- 4 -LRB104 03172 LNS 13193 b1of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.